test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-odd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable adjectives belonging to VIELG, CAHKK, MEAHTTUS, BEAKKAN, JOHTIL, GUOHCA, GARAS, LINIS, SUVRRIS, NANUS, LOSSAT, CAVGAT, CIENAL, NJUORAS, DILDDAS, VUOGAS, HEAHKAS, EATTAS, BOAKKAS, GAPPUS, VATTIS, BIEKKUS, GUOROS, NUOLUS, GEARGGUS, JIEDNAI, BOARIS, ALLAT, LAGAN, LAGAS

Tests:
  Adj - šealgat: # VIELG
    šealgat+A+Attr: šelges
    šealgat+A+Sg+Nom: šealgat
    šealgat+A+Sg+Gen: šealgada
    šealgat+A+Sg+Acc: šealgada
    šealgat+A+Sg+Ill: šealgadii
    šealgat+A+Sg+Loc: šealgadis
    šealgat+A+Pl+Acc: šealgadiid
    šealgat+A+Pl+Com: šealgadiiguin
    šealgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [šealgadeabbo, šealgadabbo, šealgadut, šealgadit, šealgadet, šealgadat]
    šealgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [šealgadeappuid, šealgadabbuid]
    šealgat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [šealgadeamos, šealgadamos]
    šealgat+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [šealgadepmosiin, šealgadamosiin]
    šealgat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: šealgadit

  Adj - loažžat: # CAHKK
    loažžat+A+Attr: [loažžadis, ložžes]
    loažžat+A+Sg+Nom: loažžat
    loažžat+A+Sg+Gen: loažžada
    loažžat+A+Sg+Acc: loažžada
    loažžat+A+Sg+Ill: loažžadii
    loažžat+A+Sg+Loc: loažžadis
    loažžat+A+Pl+Acc: loažžadiid
    loažžat+A+Pl+Com: loažžadiiguin
    loažžat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [loažžadeabbo, loažžadabbo, loažžadut, loažžadit, loažžadet, loažžadat]
    loažžat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [loažžadeappuid, loažžadabbuid]
    loažžat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [loažžadeamos, loažžadamos]
    loažžat+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [loažžadepmosiin, loažžadamosiin]
    loažžat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: loažžadit

  Adj - guoskkatmeahttun: # MEAHTTUS
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Attr: guoskkatmeahttun
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Nom: guoskkatmeahttun
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Gen: [guoskkatmeahttun, guoskkatmeahttuma]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Acc: [guoskkatmeahttun, guoskkatmeahttuma]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Ill: guoskkatmeahttumii
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Loc: guoskkatmeahttumis
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Pl+Acc: guoskkatmeahttumiid
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Pl+Com: guoskkatmeahttumiiguin
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [guoskkatmeahttuseabbo, guoskkatmeahttusabbo, guoskkatmeahttusut, guoskkatmeahttusit, guoskkatmeahttuset, guoskkatmeahttusat]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [guoskkatmeahttuseappuid, guoskkatmeahttusabbuid]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [guoskkatmeahttuseamos, guoskkatmeahttusamos]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [guoskkatmeahttusepmosiin, guoskkatmeahttusamosiin]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [guoskkatmeahttusit, guoskkatmeahttumit]

  Adj - nevvot: # BEAKKAN
    nevvot+A+Attr: nevvot
    nevvot+A+Sg+Nom: nevvot
    nevvot+A+Sg+Gen: [nevvoga, nevvot]
    nevvot+A+Sg+Acc: [nevvoga, nevvot]
    nevvot+A+Sg+Ill: nevvogii
    nevvot+A+Sg+Loc: nevvogis
    nevvot+A+Pl+Acc: nevvogiid
    nevvot+A+Pl+Com: nevvogiiguin
    nevvot+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [nevvogeabbo, nevvogabbo, nevvogut, nevvogit, nevvoget, nevvogat]
    nevvot+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [nevvogeappuid, nevvogabbuid]
    nevvot+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [nevvogeamos, nevvogamos]
    nevvot+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [nevvogepmosiin, nevvogamosiin]
    nevvot+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: nevvogit

  Adj - doaibmil: # JOHTIL
    doaibmil+A+Attr: doaibmilis
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Nom: doaibmil
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Gen: doaibmila
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Acc: doaibmila
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Ill: doaibmilii
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Loc: doaibmilis
    doaibmil+A+Pl+Acc: doaibmiliid
    doaibmil+A+Pl+Com: doaibmiliiguin
    doaibmil+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [doaibmileabbo, doaibmilabbo, doaibmilut, doaibmilit, doaibmilet, doaibmilat]
    doaibmil+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [doaibmileappuid, doaibmilabbuid]
    doaibmil+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [doaibmileamos, doaibmilamos]
    doaibmil+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [doaibmilepmosiin, doaibmilamosiin]
    doaibmil+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: doaibmilit

  Adj - meađmma: # GUOHCA
    meađmma+A+Attr: meađmma
    meađmma+A+Sg+Nom: meađmma
    meađmma+A+Sg+Gen: [meađmmaga, meađbmaga]
    meađmma+A+Sg+Acc: [meađmmaga, meađbmaga]
    meađmma+A+Sg+Ill: [meađmmagii, meađbmagii]
    meađmma+A+Sg+Loc: [meađmmagis, meađbmagis]
    meađmma+A+Pl+Acc: [meađmmagiid, meađbmagiid]
    meađmma+A+Pl+Com: [meađmmagiiguin, meađbmagiiguin]
    meađmma+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [meađmmageabbo, meađmmagabbo, meađmmagut, meađmmagit, meađmmaget, meađmmagat, meađbmageabbo, meađbmagabbo, meađbmagut, meađbmagit, meađbmaget, meađbmagat]
    meađmma+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [meađmmageappuid, meađmmagabbuid, meađbmageappuid, meađbmagabbuid]
    meađmma+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [meađmmageamos, meađmmagamos, meađbmageamos, meađbmagamos]
    meađmma+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [meađmmagepmosiin, meađmmagamosiin, meađbmagepmosiin, meađbmagamosiin]
    meađmma+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [meađmmagit, meađbmagit]

  Adj - ceaikkas: # GARAS
    ceaikkas+A+Attr: ceaika
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Nom: ceaikkas
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Gen: ceaikasa
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Acc: ceaikasa
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Ill: ceaikasii
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Loc: ceaikasis
    ceaikkas+A+Pl+Acc: ceaikasiid
    ceaikkas+A+Pl+Com: ceaikasiiguin
    ceaikkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [ceaikaseabbo, ceaikasabbo, ceaikasut, ceaikasit, ceaikaset, ceaikasat]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [ceaikaseappuid, ceaikasabbuid]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [ceaikaseamos, ceaikasamos]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [ceaikasepmosiin, ceaikasamosiin]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ceaikasit

  Adj - dimis: # LINIS
    dimis+A+Attr: dipma
    dimis+A+Sg+Nom: dimis
    dimis+A+Sg+Gen: dipmása
    dimis+A+Sg+Acc: dipmása
    dimis+A+Sg+Ill: dipmásii
    dimis+A+Sg+Loc: dipmásis
    dimis+A+Pl+Acc: dipmásiid
    dimis+A+Pl+Com: dipmásiiguin
    dimis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [dipmáseabbo, dipmásabbo, dipmásut, dipmásit, dipmáset, dipmásat]
    dimis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [dipmáseappuid, dipmásabbuid]
    dimis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [dipmáseamos, dipmásamos]
    dimis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [dipmásepmosiin, dipmásamosiin]
    dimis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dipmásit

  Adj - suvrris: # SUVRRIS
    suvrris+A+Attr: suvrra
    suvrris+A+Sg+Nom: suvrris
    suvrris+A+Sg+Gen: suvrása
    suvrris+A+Sg+Acc: suvrása
    suvrris+A+Sg+Ill: suvrásii
    suvrris+A+Sg+Loc: suvrásis
    suvrris+A+Pl+Acc: suvrásiid
    suvrris+A+Pl+Com: suvrásiiguin
    suvrris+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [suvráseabbo, suvrásabbo, suvrásut, suvrásit, suvráset, suvrásat]
    suvrris+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [suvráseappuid, suvrásabbuid]
    suvrris+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [suvráseamos, suvrásamos]
    suvrris+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [suvrásepmosiin, suvrásamosiin]
    suvrris+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: suvrásit

  Adj - nanus: # NANUS
    nanus+A+Attr: [nanu, nana]
    nanus+A+Sg+Nom: nanus
    nanus+A+Sg+Gen: nannosa
    nanus+A+Sg+Acc: nannosa
    nanus+A+Sg+Ill: nannosii
    nanus+A+Sg+Loc: nannosis
    nanus+A+Pl+Acc: nannosiid
    nanus+A+Pl+Com: nannosiiguin
    nanus+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [nannoseabbo, nannosabbo, nannosut, nannosit, nannoset, nannosat]
    nanus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [nannoseappuid, nannosabbuid]
    nanus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [nannoseamos, nannosamos]
    nanus+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [nannosepmosiin, nannosamosiin]
    nanus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: nannosit

  Adj - lossat: # LOSSAT
    lossat+A+Attr: [lossa, losses]
    lossat+A+Sg+Nom: lossat
    lossat+A+Sg+Gen: lossada
    lossat+A+Sg+Acc: lossada
    lossat+A+Sg+Ill: lossadii
    lossat+A+Sg+Loc: lossadis
    lossat+A+Pl+Acc: lossadiid
    lossat+A+Pl+Com: lossadiiguin
    lossat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [lossadeabbo, lossadabbo, lossadut, lossadit, lossadet, lossadat, losit]
    lossat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [lossadeappuid, lossadabbuid, losibuid]
    lossat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [lossadeamos, lossadamos, losimus]
    lossat+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [lossadepmosiin, lossadamosiin, losimusain]
    lossat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: lossadit

  Adj - njuolgat: # CAVGAT
    njuolgat+A+Attr: [njuolga, njulges]
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Nom: njuolgat
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Gen: njuolgada
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Acc: njuolgada
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Ill: njuolgadii
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Loc: njuolgadis
    njuolgat+A+Pl+Acc: njuolgadiid
    njuolgat+A+Pl+Com: njuolgadiiguin
    njuolgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [njuolgadeabbo, njuolgadabbo, njuolgadut, njuolgadit, njuolgadet, njuolgadat, njuolggat]
    njuolgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [njuolgadeappuid, njuolgadabbuid, njuolggabuid]
    njuolgat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [njuolgadeamos, njuolgadamos, njuolggamus]
    njuolgat+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [njuolgadepmosiin, njuolgadamosiin, njuolggamusain]
    njuolgat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: njuolgadit

  Adj - čieŋal: # CIENAL
    čieŋal+A+Attr: čiekŋalis
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Nom: čieŋal
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Gen: čiekŋala
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Acc: čiekŋala
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Ill: čiekŋalii
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Loc: čiekŋalis
    čieŋal+A+Pl+Acc: čiekŋaliid
    čieŋal+A+Pl+Com: čiekŋaliiguin
    čieŋal+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [čiekŋaleabbo, čiekŋalabbo, čiekŋalut, čiekŋalit, čiekŋalet, čiekŋalat]
    čieŋal+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [čiekŋaleappuid, čiekŋalabbuid]
    čieŋal+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [čiekŋaleamos, čiekŋalamos]
    čieŋal+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [čiekŋalepmosiin, čiekŋalamosiin]
    čieŋal+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: čiekŋalit

  Adj - stoaiddas: # NJUORAS
    stoaiddas+A+Attr: [stoaida, stoaiddas]
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Nom: stoaiddas
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Gen: stoaidasa
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Acc: stoaidasa
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Ill: stoaidasii
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Loc: stoaidasis
    stoaiddas+A+Pl+Acc: stoaidasiid
    stoaiddas+A+Pl+Com: stoaidasiiguin
    stoaiddas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [stoaidaseabbo, stoaidasabbo, stoaidasut, stoaidasit, stoaidaset, stoaidasat]
    stoaiddas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [stoaidaseappuid, stoaidasabbuid]
    stoaiddas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [stoaidaseamos, stoaidasamos]
    stoaiddas+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [stoaidasepmosiin, stoaidasamosiin]
    stoaiddas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stoaidasit

  Adj - suohtas: # DILDDAS
    suohtas+A+Attr: [suohtasis, suohtas]
    suohtas+A+Sg+Nom: suohtas
    suohtas+A+Sg+Gen: suohttasa
    suohtas+A+Sg+Acc: suohttasa
    suohtas+A+Sg+Ill: suohttasii
    suohtas+A+Sg+Loc: suohttasis
    suohtas+A+Pl+Acc: suohttasiid
    suohtas+A+Pl+Com: suohttasiiguin
    suohtas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [suohttaseabbo, suohttasabbo, suohttasut, suohttasit, suohttaset, suohttasat]
    suohtas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [suohttaseappuid, suohttasabbuid]
    suohtas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [suohttaseamos, suohttasamos]
    suohtas+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [suohttasepmosiin, suohttasamosiin]
    suohtas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: suohttasit

  Adj - vuogas: # VUOGAS
    vuogas+A+Attr: vuogas
    vuogas+A+Sg+Nom: vuogas
    vuogas+A+Sg+Gen: vuohkkasa
    vuogas+A+Sg+Acc: vuohkkasa
    vuogas+A+Sg+Ill: vuohkkasii
    vuogas+A+Sg+Loc: vuohkkasis
    vuogas+A+Pl+Acc: vuohkkasiid
    vuogas+A+Pl+Com: vuohkkasiiguin
    vuogas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [vuohkkaseabbo, vuohkkasabbo, vuohkkasut, vuohkkasit, vuohkkaset, vuohkkasat]
    vuogas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [vuohkkaseappuid, vuohkkasabbuid]
    vuogas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [vuohkkaseamos, vuohkkasamos]
    vuogas+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [vuohkkasepmosiin, vuohkkasamosiin]
    vuogas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: vuohkkasit

  Adj - duŋggas: # HEAHKAS
    duŋggas+A+Attr: [duŋggasis, duŋga]
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Nom: duŋggas
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Gen: duŋgasa
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Acc: duŋgasa
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Ill: duŋgasii
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Loc: duŋgasis
    duŋggas+A+Pl+Acc: duŋgasiid
    duŋggas+A+Pl+Com: duŋgasiiguin
    duŋggas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [duŋgaseabbo, duŋgasabbo, duŋgasut, duŋgasit, duŋgaset, duŋgasat]
    duŋggas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [duŋgaseappuid, duŋgasabbuid]
    duŋggas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [duŋgaseamos, duŋgasamos]
    duŋggas+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [duŋgasepmosiin, duŋgasamosiin]
    duŋggas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: duŋgasit
